Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1489
Rental deposit; unlawful retention; damages.

If a landlord retains all or any portion of a rental deposit in violation of sections 76-1483 to 76-1488, the tenant may recover the amount of the rental deposit due to the tenant, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees. In addition, if the landlord's retention of the rental deposit or any portion thereof is willful and not in good faith, the tenant may recover an amount equal to one month's periodic rent or two times the amount of the rental deposit, whichever is less, as liquidated damages.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 40;

Laws 2021, LB320, § 12.